trunk/apertium-cy-en/apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
 <pardef n="that__rel">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="where__rel">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


<pardef n="'s__gen">

                          <e>
    <p>
      <l/>
      <r><s n="gen"/></r>
    </p>
  </e>

</pardef>








<pardef n="hello__ij">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>





<pardef n="Dutch__n">

                           <e>
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
      <p>
         <l>ies</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>

 </pardef>

   <pardef n="drachma__n">

                           <e>
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
      <p>
         <l>e</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>s</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>i</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

 </pardef>

 <pardef n="house__n">
                           <e>
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
                           <e>
      <p>
         <l>s</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
 </pardef>

 <pardef n="access__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>es</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="east__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>



 <pardef n="bab/y__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>y</l>
       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>ies</l>
       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ys</l>
       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>



 <pardef n="analys/is__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>is</l>
       <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>es</l>
       <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="maxim/um__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>um</l>
       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>a</l>
       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ums</l>
       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="mon/ey__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>ey</l>
       <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>eys</l>
       <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ies</l>
       <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


<pardef n="m/an__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>an</l>
       <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>en</l>
       <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>



 <pardef n="bass__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>es</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="bus__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>es</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ses</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="politics__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="wol/f__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>f</l>
       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>ves</l>
       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>fs</l>
       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="li/fe__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>fe</l>
       <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>ves</l>
       <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="p/erson__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>erson</l>
       <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>eople</l>
       <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ersons</l>
       <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="personnel__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="staff__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>s</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

   
  </pardef>


 <pardef n="child__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>ren</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


<pardef n="m/ouse__n">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ouse</l>
          <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>ice</l>
          <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="f/oot__n">

                            <e>
     <p>
       <l>oot</l>
       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>eet</l>
       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>oot</l>
       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>


 <pardef n="br/other__n">

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>other</l>
       <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ethren</l>
       <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

                           <e>
     <p>
       <l>others</l>
       <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

  </pardef>

  

                        <e lm="calf"><i>cal</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="where"><i>where</i><par n="where__rel"/></e>
                        <e lm="who"><i>who</i><par n="that__rel"/></e>
                        <e lm="that"><i>that</i><par n="that__rel"/></e>
                        <e lm="whom"><i>whom</i><par n="that__rel"/></e>
                        <e><i>'s</i><par n="'s__gen"/></e>
                        <e lm="congratulations"><i>congratulations</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
                        <e lm="good morning"><i>good<b/>morning</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
                        <e lm="good night"><i>good<b/>night</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
                        <e lm="wife"><i>wi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="child"><i>child</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="bus"><i>bus</i><par n="bus__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="brother"><i>br</i><par n="br/other__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="box"><i>box</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="foot"><i>f</i><par n="f/oot__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="minimum"><i>minim</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="maximum"><i>maxim</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="knife"><i>kni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="bass"><i>bass</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="post office box"><i>post<b/>office<b/>box</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="person, people"><i>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="bacteria"><i>bacteria</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="brass"><i>brass</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="tuna"><i>tuna</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="shelf"><i>shel</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="castle"><i>castle</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="mouse"><i>m</i><par n="m/ouse__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="thief"><i>thie</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="trousers"><i>trousers</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="businesswoman"><i>businesswom</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="discrepancy"><i>discrepanc</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="grandchild"><i>grandchild</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="shears"><i>shears</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="midwife"><i>midwi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="linesman"><i>linesm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="atlas"><i>atlas</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="estimator"><i>estimator</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="impurity"><i>impurit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="drachma"><i>drachma</i><par n="drachma__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="coachman"><i>coachm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="butterfingers"><i>butterfingers</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="ptilosis"><i>ptilos</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="broncholithiasis"><i>broncholithias</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="audiometry"><i>audiometr</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="polyposis"><i>polypos</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="intermodulation"><i>intermodulation</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="dregs"><i>dregs</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="thesaurus"><i>thesaurus</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="Dutch"><i>Dutch</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="jazz"><i>jazz</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="economics"><i>economics</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="supply and demand"><i>supply<b/>and<b/>demand</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
                        <e lm="underwear"><i>underwear</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
